Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5952.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 409. (1) The post-traumatic stress injury fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from any source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) The director is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (4) The director shall expend money from the fund on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) To pay claims authorized under section 407. (b) To pay costs to administer the post-traumatic stress injury fund. (5) If there is insufficient money in the fund to pay claims authorized under section 407, claims that are approved but not paid must be paid if fund revenues become available, and those claims must be paid before subsequently approved claims. The director shall develop and implement a process to notify the legislature that money in the post-traumatic stress injury fund may be insufficient to cover future claims if at any time the director reasonably believes that within 60 days the money in the fund will be insufficient to pay claims. The process must, at a minimum, do all of the following: (a) Identify a specific date by which the money in the fund will become insufficient to pay claims. (b) Outline a clear process indicating the order in which claims pending with the fund will be paid. (c) Outline a clear process indicating the order in which claims that were pending with the fund when money became insufficient will be paid, if money subsequently becomes available. (6) The director shall submit an annual report to the state budget director and the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations not later than April 1 of each year that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The total number of claims received under the post-traumatic stress injury fund in the immediately preceding calendar year. (b) The number of claims approved and the total dollar amount of claims paid by the post-traumatic stress injury fund in the immediately preceding calendar year. (c) The costs of administering the post-traumatic stress injury fund in the immediately preceding calendar year. (7) By March 31 of each year, the agency shall report to the chairs of the appropriations committees of the senate and the house of representatives the estimated amount of both of the following: (a) The anticipated cost of benefits in the next fiscal year for claims authorized under section 407 and payable by the post-traumatic stress injury fund. (b) The amount of any anticipated shortfall in the post-traumatic stress injury fund that would prevent payment of claims for the current fiscal year. (8) The post-traumatic stress injury fund has the same rights under this act as an employer or carrier. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06709'26) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H06709'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.